Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6755XS (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2253 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 280.9C relating to implementing a 4 graduation requirement requiring completion of a course related 5 to food nutrition and preparation in the same manner as a 6 school district. 7 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 10 requirements of section 280.9C relating to implementing a 11 graduation requirement requiring completion of a course related 12 to food nutrition and preparation in the same manner as a 13 school district. 14 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 280.9C Food nutrition and preparation 15 ââ graduation requirement. 16 The board of directors of each school district and the 17 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school 18 shall require that all students, beginning with students 19 in the 2030-2031 graduating class, in grades nine through 20 twelve complete, as a condition of graduation, one-half unit 21 of instruction related to food nutrition and preparation. 22 A student may satisfy this requirement by completing 23 one semester, or the trimester or quarter equivalent, of 24 instruction related to food nutrition and preparation in grade 25 seven or eight. 26 Sec. 4. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 27 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 28 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 29 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 30 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 31 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 32 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 33 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 34 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 35 -1- LSB 6755XS (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2253 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 1 districts. 2